Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.25
Nonbeverage user, defined.

Nonbeverage user means
every manufacturer of any of the products set forth and described in subsection
(4) of section 53-160, when such product contains alcoholic liquor, and all
laboratories, hospitals, and sanatoria using alcoholic liquor for nonbeverage
purposes.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 33.